North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 2. Hospital Licensure.

§ 131E-77.
Licensure requirement.

No person or governmental unit shall establish or operate a hospital in this state without a license. An infirmary is not required to obtain a license under this Part.

The Commission shall prescribe by rule that any licensee or prospective applicant seeking to make specified types of alteration or addition to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall submit plans and specifications before commencement to the Department for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with the applicable rules under this Part.

An applicant for licensing under this Part shall provide information related to hospital operations as requested by the Department. The required information shall be submitted by the applicant on forms provided by the Department and established by rule.

Upon receipt of an application for a license, the Department shall issue a license if it finds that the applicant complies with the provisions of this Article and the rules of the Commission. The Department shall renew each license in accordance with the rules of the Commission. The Department shall charge the applicant a nonrefundable annual base license fee plus a nonrefundable annual per-bed fee as follows:

Click to view

The Department shall issue the license to the operator of the hospital who shall not transfer or assign it except with the written approval of the Department. The license shall designate the number and types of inpatient beds, the number of operating rooms, and the number of gastrointestinal endoscopy rooms.

(e1)

Any license issued by the Department shall include only facilities (i) operated by the hospital within a single county and (ii) operated by the hospital in an immediately adjoining county; provided, however, that facilities operated by a hospital in an immediately adjoining county shall only be included within the same hospital license if the applicant hospital demonstrates all of the following to the satisfaction of the Department:

There was previously only one hospital licensed by the Department providing inpatient services in the immediately adjoining county.

The licensed hospital in the immediately adjoining county described in subdivision (1) of this subsection closed or otherwise ceased providing hospital services to patients no more than three years prior to the date the applicant hospital first applied to license a facility in such immediately adjoining county.If the Department approves a hospital’s initial request to include within its hospital license a facility in an immediately adjoining county, then any other hospital services thereafter developed and operated by the applicant in such immediately adjoining county in accordance with applicable law may also be included within and covered by the license issued to the applicant by the Department.

The operator shall post the license on the licensed premises in an area accessible to the public.

Facility Type Number of Beds Base Fee Per-Bed Fee General Acute Hospitals: 1-49 beds $250.00 $17.50 50-99 beds $350.00 $17.50 100-199 beds $450.00 $17.50 200-399 beds $550.00 $17.50 400-699 beds $750.00 $17.50 700+ beds $950.00 $17.50 Other Hospitals: $500.00 $17.50

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1949, c. 920, ss. 3, 4; 1963, c. 66; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 1090, s. 1; 1975, c. 718, s. 2; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 34.2(a); 2005-276, s. 41.2(b); 2005-346, s. 3; 2009-451, s. 10.76(e); 2011-145, s. 18.10(c); 2011-391, s. 42.1; 2016-94, s. 12G.3(a); 2017-57, s. 11G.2(a).

§ 131E-78.
Adverse action on a license.

The Department shall have the authority to deny, suspend, revoke, annul, withdraw, recall, cancel, or amend a license in any case when it finds a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this Part or any rule promulgated under this Part.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-444, s. 1, effective August 23, 2007.

(b1)

The Secretary may suspend the admission of any new patients to specific areas of a hospital or suspend specific services of a hospital licensed under this Article where the conditions of the hospital constitute a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this Part or any rule adopted under this Part and are dangerous to the health or safety of the patients. When the Secretary suspends admissions or specific services, the suspension shall be limited to the smallest possible components of the hospital. The Department shall provide consultation to assist the hospital in correcting the conditions that led to the suspension in order that the suspension can be lifted at the earliest possible time after the Secretary is satisfied that conditions or circumstances merit removal of the suspension. In determining whether to suspend admissions or services under this subsection, the Secretary shall consider the following factors:

The character and degree of impact of the conditions at the hospital on the health and safety of its patients.

The character and degree of impact that the proposed suspension of admissions or services would have on the functionality of the hospital and the availability of services necessary to the community or to current patients of the hospital.

Whether all other reasonable means for correcting the problem have been exhausted and no less restrictive alternative to suspension of admissions or service exists.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-444, s. 1, effective August 23, 2007.

(c1)

A hospital may contest any adverse action on its license under this section in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 1090, s. 1; 1981, c. 614, ss. 16, 17; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2007-444, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-444, s. 1, effective August 23, 2007, deleted subsections (b) and (c) related to hearings for application denials; and added subdivisions (b1) and (c1).

§§ 131E-78.1 through 131E-78.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 131E-78.5.
Designation as primary stroke center.

The Department shall designate as a primary stroke center any hospital licensed under this Article that demonstrates to the Department that the hospital is certified by the Joint Commission or other nationally recognized accrediting body that requires conformance to best practices for stroke care in order to be identified as a primary stroke center. A hospital that is certified by the Joint Commission or other nationally recognized accrediting body that requires conformance to best practices for stroke care in order to be identified as a primary stroke center shall report the certification to the Department within 90 days of receiving that certification. A hospital shall inform the Department of any changes to its certification status within 30 days of any change.

Each hospital designated as a primary stroke center pursuant to this section shall make efforts to coordinate the provision of appropriate acute stroke care with other hospitals licensed in this State through a formal written agreement. The agreement shall, at a minimum, address (i) transportation of acute stroke patients to hospitals designated as primary stroke centers and (ii) acceptance by hospitals designated as primary stroke centers of acute stroke patients initially treated at hospitals that are not capable of providing appropriate stroke care.

The Department shall maintain within the Division of Health Service Regulation, Office of Emergency Services, a list of the hospitals designated as primary stroke centers in accordance with this section and post the list on the Department’s Internet Web site. Annually on June 1, the Department shall transmit this list to the medical director of each licensed emergency medical services provider in this State.

A hospital licensed under this Article shall not advertise or hold itself out to the public as a primary stroke center unless certified as a primary stroke center by the Joint Commission or other nationally recognized accrediting body that requires conformance to best practices for stroke care in order to be identified as a primary stroke center.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

Establish a standard of medical practice for stroke patients.

Restrict in any way the authority of any hospital to provide services authorized under its hospital license.

The Department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2013-44, s. 1.

§ 131E-79.
Rules and enforcement.

The Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this Article.

The Department shall enforce this Article and the rules of the Commission.

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-79.1.
Counseling patients regarding prescriptions.

Any hospital or other health care facility licensed pursuant to this Chapter or Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, health maintenance organization, local health department, community health center, medical office, or facility operated by a health care provider licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, providing patient counseling by a physician, a registered nurse, or any other appropriately trained health care professional shall be deemed in compliance with the rules adopted by the North Carolina Board of Pharmacy regarding patient counseling.

As used in this section, “patient counseling” means the effective communication of information to the patient or representative in order to improve therapeutic outcomes by maximizing proper use of prescription medications and devices.

History.

1993, c. 529, s. 7.7.

§ 131E-79.2.
Educating parents of newborns regarding pertussis disease.

Each hospital licensed under this Article shall provide to the parents of newborns delivered at the hospital free, medically accurate educational information about pertussis disease and the availability of the tetanus-diphtheria and pertussis (Tdap) vaccine to protect against pertussis disease. The hospital shall provide this educational information to parents during the postpartum period and prior to the mother’s discharge from the hospital. As used in this section, “postpartum period” means the period of time between the mother’s admittance to the hospital for delivery of the newborn child through the first few hours after childbirth.

The educational information provided to parents pursuant to this section shall include, at a minimum, the most current recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices regarding the use of tetanus-toxoid-diphtheria-acellular pertussis (Tdap) vaccine to reduce the burden of pertussis in infants.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a hospital to provide or pay for any vaccination against pertussis disease.

History.

2013-161, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to immunization, generally, see

G.S. 130A-152

et seq.

§ 131E-79.3.
Hospital patient visitation, civil penalty.

Each hospital licensed under this Article shall permit patients to receive visitors to the fullest extent permitted under any applicable rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law.

In the event the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or any other federal agency finds a hospital has violated any rule, regulation, guidance, or federal law relating to a patient’s visitation rights, the Department may issue a warning to the hospital about the violation and give the hospital not more than 24 hours to allow visitation. If visitation is not allowed after the 24-hour warning period, the Department shall impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the hospital was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any fine or civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency may choose to impose.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, in the event that circumstances require the complete closure of a hospital to visitors, the hospital shall use its best efforts to develop alternate visitation protocols that would allow visitation to the greatest extent safely possible. If those alternate protocols are found by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or any other federal agency to violate any rule, regulation, guidance, or federal law relating to a patient’s visitation rights, the Department may impose a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each instance on each day the hospital was found to have a violation. This civil penalty shall be in addition to any fine or civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency may choose to impose.

Each hospital shall provide notice of the patient visitation rights in this act to patients and, when possible, family members of patients. The required notice shall also include the contact information for the agency or individuals tasked with investigating violations of hospital patient visitation.

Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each hospital shall allow compassionate care visits. A hospital may require compassionate care visitors to submit to health screenings necessary to prevent the spread of infectious diseases, and, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a hospital may restrict a compassionate care visitor who does not pass a health screening requirement or who has tested positive for an infectious disease. A hospital may require compassionate care visitors to adhere to infection control procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment. Compassionate care situations that require visits include, but are not limited to, the following:

End-of-life situations.

A patient who was living with his or her family before recently being admitted to the facility is struggling with the change in environment and lack of physical family support.

A patient who is grieving after a friend or family member recently passed away.

A patient who needs cueing and encouragement with eating or drinking, previously provided by family or caregivers, is experiencing weight loss or dehydration.

A patient, who used to talk and interact with others, is experiencing emotional distress, seldom speaking, or crying more frequently when the patient had rarely cried in the past.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to require each hospital to have written policies and procedures for visitation.

History.

2021-171, s. 2; 2021-181, s. 2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-171 provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the COVID-19 pandemic has caused great uncertainty and anxiety across our State and has significantly affected patients and residents in health care facilities; and

“Whereas, health care facilities have made many efforts to keep patients and employees in a safe environment and have endeavored to minimize, to the extent possible, the risk of spread of the coronavirus disease; and

“Whereas, as a result of COVID-19 prevention measures, many unintended consequences have occurred to patients and residents of these facilities who were not diagnosed with COVID-19; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly has become aware of numerous patients and residents of health care facilities across our State who were not diagnosed with COVID-19, but as a result of visitation policies have been prohibited from having any visitors, including a spouse, parent, close family member, guardian, health care agent, or caregiver; and

“Whereas, many families have been unable to be physically present with their loved ones while in a hospital, nursing home, combination home, hospice care, adult care home, special care unit, or residential treatment setting for mental illness, developmental or intellectual disability, or substance use disorder, and have been limited to electronic video communications, if any, with the patient; and

“Whereas, the patients and residents who have been affected in the above-described manner have included adults, minors, and individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that it is in the interest of the State and its residents that these patients and residents of health care facilities, in compliance with the rules, regulations, and guidelines of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and federal law, should not be denied visitation by visitors of their choosing throughout the period of hospitalization or residential treatment; Now, therefore,”

Session Laws 2021-171, s. 1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The No Patient Left Alone Act.’” This section became effective November 1, 2021.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-181, s. 2(a), in subsection (a), substituted “Article” for “Chapter”; and in subsection (e), in the introductory language, substituted “Subject to, and to the fullest extent permitted by, any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by either the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or any federal law, each” for “Each.”

§ 131E-80.
Inspections.

The Department shall make or cause to be made inspections as it may deem necessary. Any hospital licensed under this Part shall at all times be subject to inspections by the Department according to the rules of the Commission. Except as provided under

G.S. 131E-77(b)

of this Part, after the hospital’s initial licensing, any location included or added to the hospital’s accreditation through an accrediting body approved pursuant to section 1865(a) of the Social Security Act, shall be deemed to be part of the hospital’s license; provided, however, that all locations may be subject to inspections which the Department deems necessary to validate compliance with the requirements set forth in this Part.

The Department may delegate to any state officer or agency the authority to inspect hospitals. The Department may revoke this delegated authority at its discretion and make its own inspections.

Authorized representatives of the Department shall have at all times the right of proper entry upon any and all parts of the premises of any place in which entry is necessary to carry out the provisions of this Part or the rules adopted by the Commission; and it shall be unlawful for any person to resist a proper entry by such authorized representative upon any premises other than a private dwelling. However, no representative shall, by this entry onto the premises, endanger the health or well being of any patient being treated in the hospital.

To enable the Department to determine compliance with this Part and the rules promulgated under the authority of this Part and to investigate complaints made against a hospital licensed under this Part, while maintaining the confidentiality of the complainant, the Department shall have the authority to review any writing or other record in any recording medium which pertains to the admission, discharge, medication, treatment, medical condition, or history of persons who are or have been patients of the hospital licensed under this Part and the personnel records of those individuals employed by the licensed hospital. The examinations of these records is permitted notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 8-53

, “Communications between physician and patient,” or any other provision of law relating to the confidentiality of communications between physician and patient. Proceedings of medical review committees are exempt from the provisions of this section. The hospital, its employees, and any person interviewed during these inspections shall be immune from liability for damages resulting from the disclosure of any information to the Department. Any confidential or privileged information received from review of records or interviews shall be kept confidential by the Department and not disclosed without written authorization of the patient, employee or legal representative, or unless disclosure is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Department shall institute appropriate policies and procedures to ensure that this information shall not be disclosed without authorization or court order. The Department shall not disclose the name of anyone who has furnished information concerning a hospital without the consent of that person. Any officer, administrator, or employee of the Department who willfully discloses confidential or privileged information without appropriate authorization or court order shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined in the discretion of the court but not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00). Neither the names of persons furnishing information nor any confidential or privileged information obtained from records or interviews shall be considered “public records” within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

, “Public Records” defined.

Information received by the Commission and the Department through filed reports, license applications, or inspections that are required or authorized by the provisions of this Part, may be disclosed publicly except where this disclosure would violate the confidential relationship existing between physician and patient. However, no such public disclosure shall identify the patient involved without permission of the patient or court order.

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 1090, s. 1; 1981, c. 586, s. 3; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 957; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-487, s. 4(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-487, s. 4(b), effective August 26, 2009, added the third sentence in subsection (a).

§ 131E-81.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Penalties.

Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any hospital without a license shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall only be liable for a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, any person who willfully violates any provision of this Part or who willfully fails to perform any act required, or who willfully performs any act prohibited by this Part, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. However, any person who willfully violates any rule adopted by the Commission under this Part or who willfully fails to perform any act required by, or who willfully does any act prohibited by, these rules shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 958; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 131E-81.
Penalties.

Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any hospital without a license is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction is only liable for a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction is a separate offense.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, any person that willfully violates any provision of this Part, willfully fails to perform any act required by this Part, or willfully performs any act prohibited by this Part is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 958; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2021-84, s. 10.

§ 131E-82.
Injunction.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Department may, in the manner provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the State for injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management or operation of a hospital without a license.

If any person shall hinder the proper performance of duty of the Secretary or a representative in carrying out the provisions of this Part, the Secretary may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the hindrance occurred for injunctive relief against the continued hindrance, irrespective of all other remedies at law.

Actions under this section shall be in accordance with Article 37 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes, and Rule 65 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

1947, c. 933, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-83.
Temporary change of hospital bed capacity.

A hospital may temporarily increase its bed capacity by up to ten percent (10%) over its licensed bed capacity by utilizing observation beds for hospital inpatients if the hospital notifies and obtains the approval of the Division of Health Service Regulation. For purposes of this section, “temporarily” means not longer than 60 consecutive days.

History.

2001-410, s. 1; 2007-182, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Division of Health Service Regulation” for “Division of Facility Services.”

§ 131E-84.
Waiver of rules for hospitals that provide temporary shelter or temporary services during a disaster or emergency.

The Division of Health Service Regulation may temporarily waive, during disasters or emergencies declared in accordance with Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, any rules of the Commission pertaining to a hospital to the extent necessary to allow the hospital to provide temporary shelter and temporary services requested by the emergency management agency. The Division may identify, in advance of a declared disaster or emergency, rules that may be waived, and the extent to which the rules may be waived, upon a declaration of disaster or emergency in accordance with Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes. The Division may also waive rules under this subsection during a declared disaster or emergency upon the request of an emergency management agency and may rescind the waiver if, after investigation, the Division determines the waiver poses an unreasonable risk to the health, safety, or welfare of any of the persons occupying the hospital. The emergency management agency requesting temporary shelter or temporary services shall notify the Division within 72 hours of the time the preapproved waivers are deemed by the emergency management agency to apply.

As used in this section, “emergency management agency” is as defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3

.

History.

2007-444, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 2(t).

Cross References.

As to emergency management efforts, generally, see

G.S. 166A-19

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-12, s. 2(t), effective October 1, 2012, in subsection (a), substituted “Article 1A” for “Article 1” in the first and second sentences; and in subsection (b), substituted “G.S. 166A-19.3” for “G.S. 166A-4.”

§ 131E-84.05.
Patient visitation by clergy, including during declared disasters or emergencies.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 131E-84

, Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law to the contrary, each hospital licensed under this Article shall allow a clergy member to visit any patient admitted to the hospital who requests or consents to be visited by a clergy member during the patient’s hospital stay, including a hospital stay that occurs during a declared disaster or emergency. A hospital may require a visiting clergy member to submit to health screenings necessary to prevent the spread of infectious diseases, and, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a hospital may restrict a visiting clergy member who does not pass a health screening requirement or who has tested positive for an infectious disease. A hospital may require a visiting clergy member to adhere to infection control procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment, as long as the infection control procedures do not interfere with the religious beliefs of the patient or the visiting clergy member.

History.

2021-156, s. 1.

§ 131E-84.1.
Human trafficking public awareness sign.

Each hospital licensed under this Article shall prominently display in its emergency room or emergency department in a place that is clearly conspicuous and visible to employees and the public a public awareness sign created and provided by the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission that contains the National Human Trafficking Resource hotline information.

History.

2017-57, s. 17.4(d); 2017-197, s. 5.8.